Massachusetts, session 194th, H2407.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 112 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out section 13, as so appearing, and inserting in place thereof the
following section:-
Section 13. (a) As used in this chapter, "podiatry" is the specialty that addresses the
diagnosis and treatment of pathologies and conditions of the leg, with special emphasis in the
diagnosis and treatment of the foot, ankle and their governing and related structures of the leg by
any and all means. Osseous surgical treatment is limited to that part of the leg at or distal to the
tibial tubercle.
(b) As used in sections 12B, 12G and 80B, "physician" shall include a podiatrist
registered under section 16.
of 2

(c) Sections 13 to 18, inclusive, shall not apply to surgeons of the United States Army,
United States Navy or of the United States Public Health Service or to physicians registered in
the commonwealth.
of 2